Utah statutes.
75-5a-114.   Powers of custodian.

(1)  A custodian, acting in a custodial capacity, has all the rights, powers, and authority over custodial property that unmarried adult owners have over their own property, but a custodian may exercise those rights, powers, and authority in that capacity only.

(2)  This section does not relieve a custodian from liability for breach of Section 75-5a-113.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 1990 General Session

